ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Реклама и маркетинг > Выставочные стенды: Стенды с подсветкой; Баннерные стенды; Складные цифровые панели; Плоские цифровые информационные панели; Интерактивные плоские панели; Интерактивные столы для детей; Информационные киоски; Модульные стенды; Панорамные стенды; Поп-ап стенды; Настольные стенды; Тотемы; Прозрачные витрины
da: Erhverv og industri > Reklame og marketing > Messedisplay: Baggrundsbelyste displays; Bannerstativer; Digitale A-tavler; Digitale fladskærme til skiltning; Interaktive fladskærme; Interaktive børneborde; Selvbetjeningsterminaler; Modulære skærme; Panoramaskærme; Pop-up skærme; Bordskærme; Totempæle; Gennemsigtige boksdisplays
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 廣告和行銷 > 展場背板: 背光螢幕; 橫幅立架; 數位 A 字立牌; 數位平面標誌板; 互動式平面螢幕; 互動式兒童桌; 自助服務機; 模組螢幕; 環景螢幕; 突出式螢幕; 桌上型螢幕; 展示立牌; 透明展示箱
en: Business & Industrial > Advertising & Marketing > Trade Show Displays: Backlit Displays; Banner Stands; Digital A-Boards; Digital Signage Flat Panels; Interactive Flat Panels; Interactive Kids' Tables; Kiosks; Modular Displays; Panoramas; Pop-Up Displays; Tabletop Displays; Totems; Transparent Box Displays
nb: Forretninger og industri > Annonsering og markedsføring > Varemessedisplayer: Bakgrunnsbelyste skjermer; Bannerstativer; Digitale A-Boards; Flatskjermer for digitale skilt; Interaktive flatskjermer; Interakitve barnebord; Kiosker; Modulære skjermer; Panoramaer; Pop-Up-skjermer; Bordskjermer; Totemer; Transparente bokser
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Publicidade e marketing > Displays para feiras comerciais: Displays retroiluminados; Suportes para banners; Quadros A digitais; Painéis planos de sinalização digital; Painéis planos interativos; Mesas infantis interativas; Quiosques; Displays modulares; Panorâmicas; Displays pop-up; Displays de mesa; Totens; Displays de caixa transparente
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Publicitate și marketing > Standuri de prezentare pentru târguri: Standuri de prezentare retroiluminate; Standuri pentru bannere; Panouri stradale digitale; Panouri plate pentru semnalizare digitală; Panouri plate interactive; Mese interactive pentru copii; Chioșcuri; Standuri de prezentare modulare; Panorame; Standuri de prezentare pop-up; Standuri de prezentare de masă; Totemuri; Standuri de prezentare cu casete transparente
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 広告・マーケティング > 展示会ディスプレイ: バックライト付きディスプレイ; バナースタンド; デジタルAボード; デジタルサイネージ フラットパネル; インタラクティブ フラットパネル; インタラクティブ キッズテーブル; キオスク; モジュラーディスプレイ; パノラマ; ポップアップ ディスプレイ; 卓上ディスプレイ; トーテム; 透明ボックスディスプレイ
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Reklama i marketing > Stoiska targowe: Stoiska podświetlane; Stojaki na banery; Cyfrowe tablice w kształcie litery A; Płaskie panele Digital Signage; Interaktywne panele płaskie; Interaktywne stoły dla dzieci; Kioski; Wyświetlacze modułowe; Panoramy; Przenośne wyświetlacze; Wyświetlacze stołowe; Totemy; Przezroczyste wyświetlacze pudełkowe
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Reklamcılık ve Pazarlama > Fuar Stantları: Arkadan Aydınlatmalı Stantlar; Banner Standları; Dijital A Kartları; Dijital Tabela Düz Paneller; İnteraktif Düz Paneller; İnteraktif Çocuk Masaları; Kiosklar; Modüler Stantlar; Panorama; Açılır Stantlar; Masaüstü Stantlar; Totemler; Şeffaf Kutu Stantlar
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Oglašavanje i marketing > Izlozi za trgovačke sajmove: Zasloni s pozadinskim osvjetljenjem; Stalci za transparente; Digitalne A-ploče; Ravni zasloni za digitalne znakove; Interaktivni ravni zasloni; Interaktivni stolovi za djecu; Kiosci; Modularni zasloni; Panorame; Pop-up zasloni; Stolni zasloni; Totemi; Zasloni s prozirnim kutijama
sv: Företag och industri > Annonsering och marknadsföring > Bildväggar för mässor: Bakgrundsbelysta displayer; Bannerstativ; Digitala A-brädor; Digitala skyltar platta paneler; Interaktiva platta paneler; Interaktiva barnbord; Kiosker; Modulära skärmar; Panoraman; Popup-skärmar; Bordsskärmar; Totems; Transparenta lådskärmar
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Διαφήμιση & Μάρκετινγκ > Συστήματα προβολής για εκθέσεις: Φωτιζόμενα συστήματα προβολής; Βάσεις πανό; Ψηφιακές πινακίδες τύπου «Α»; Ψηφιακές οθόνες προβολής; Διαδραστικά επίπεδα Πάνελ; Διαδραστικά τραπέζια για παιδιά; Περίπτερα; Αρθρωτές οθόνες; Πανοράματα; Αναδυόμενες οθόνες; Επιτραπέζιες οθόνες; Totems; Διαφανείς οθόνες κουτιών
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Reklama ir rinkodara > Prekybos parodų stendai: Ekranai su foniniu apšvietimu; Reklaminių skydų stovai; Skaitmeninės pastatomos lentos; Skaitmeniniai plokštieji reklaminiai ekranai; Interaktyvūs plokštieji ekranai; Interaktyvūs stalai vaikams; Kioskai; Moduliniai reklaminiai skydai; Panoramos; Pastatomi reklaminiai skydai; Staliniai skydai; Totemai; Skaidrios demonstracinės dėžės
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Oglaševanje in trženje > Razstavni pulti za sejme: Osvetljeni razstavni pulti; Stojala za transparente; Digitalne oglasne-plošče; Ploščati paneli za digitalno oglaševanje; Interaktivni zasloni; Interaktivne otroške tablice; Stojnice; Modularni zasloni; Panoramski zasloni; Pop up stene; Namizni prikazovalniki; Stebri; Prozorne škatle za prikazovanje
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การโฆษณาและการตลาด > ดิสเพลย์งานแสดงสินค้า: ดิสเพลย์แบบมีไฟส่องด้านหลัง; ที่ตั้งแบนเนอร์; บอร์ดดิจิตอลรูปตัว A; จอแบนสำหรับโฆษณาดิจิตอล; จอแบนแบบโต้ตอบ; โต๊ะสำหรับเด็กแบบโต้ตอบ; ตู้คีออส; ดิสเพลย์แบบโมดูลาร์; พาโนรามา; ดิสเพลย์แบบป๊อปอัป; ดิสเพลย์แบบตั้งโต๊ะ; ป้ายโทเท็ม; ดิสเพลย์แบบกล่องโปร่งใส
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Quảng cáo & Tiếp thị > Trưng bày triển lãm: Tủ trưng bày có đèn nền; Giá căng biểu ngữ; Bảng chữ A kỹ thuật số; Màn hình phẳng chiếu biển hiệu kỹ thuật số; Màn hình phẳng tương tác; Mặt bàn tương tác cho trẻ; Ki-ốt; Tủ trưng bày ghép; Ảnh toàn cảnh; Tấm trưng bày thời vụ; Tấm trưng bày để bàn; Cột quảng cáo; Tủ trưng bày hình hộp trong suốt
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Reclame en marketing > Displays voor handelsbeurzen: Verlichte displays; Bannerstandaards; Digitale A-borden; Flatpanelen voor digitale gevel- en uitgangborden; Interactieve flatpanelen; Interactieve kindertafels; Kiosken; Modulaire displays; Panorama's; Pop-updisplays; Tafeldisplays; Totems; Transparante doosdisplays
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 광고/마케팅 > 전시회 디스플레이: 백라이트 디스플레이; 배너 스탠드; 디지털 A보드; 디지털 사이니지 평면 패널; 대화형 평면 패널; 대화형 어린이용 테이블; 키오스크; 모듈형 디스플레이; 파노라마; 팝업 디스플레이; 탁상용 디스플레이; 입간판; 투명 박스 디스플레이
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 广告与营销 > 展会展览板: 背光显示屏; 横幅支架; 数字指示牌; 平板数字标牌; 互动平板; 互动儿童桌; 信息亭; 模块化展示架; 全景图; 弹出式展示架; 桌面展示架; 图腾; 透明框展示架
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Reklama a marketing > Výstavné steny: Podsvietené steny; Stojany na bannery; Digitálne obrazovky; Digitálne ploché panely; Interaktívne ploché panely; Interaktívne detské stolíky; Kiosky; Modulárne steny; Panorámy; Prezentačné steny; Stolové reklamné steny; Totemy; Transparentné boxové steny
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Reklama a marketing > Výstavní expozice: Podsvícené vitríny; Bannerové stojany; Digitální tabule; Ploché panely pro digital signage systémy; Interaktivní ploché panely; Interaktivní dětské stoly; Kiosky; Modulární expozice; Panoramatické expozice; Pop-up vitríny; Stolní vitríny; Totemy; Průhledná výstavní vitrína
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Mainostus ja markkinointi > Messuesittely: Taustavalaistut esittelypöydät; Banneritelineet; Digitaaliset A-taulut; Digitaalisten kylttien tasaiset paneelit; Interaktiiviset tasaiset paneelit; Interaktiiviset lasten pöydät; Kioskit; Modulaariset näytöt; Panoraamat; Pop-up-näytöt; Pöytänäytöt; Tolpat; Läpinäkyvät laatikkonäytöt
es: Economía e industria > Publicidad y márketing > Expositores para ferias: Expositores retroiluminados; Pies para pancartas; Pizarras con marco plegable; Pantallas planas de señalización digitales; Pantallas planas interactivas; Mesas interactivas para niños; Quioscos; Expositores modulares; Panorámicas; Pantallas emergentes; Pantallas de mesa; Tótems; Expositores de cajas transparentes
it: Commercio e industria > Pubblicità e marketing > Pannelli espositivi per fiere: Display retroilluminati; Supporti per banner; Tavole A digitali; Pannelli piatti per segnaletica digitale; Pannelli piatti interattivi; Tavoli interattivi per bambini; Chioschi; Espositori modulari; Panorami; Display pop-up; Espositori da tavolo; Totem; Espositori con scatole trasparenti
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Reklámozás és marketing > Kiállítási standok: Háttérvilágítású standok; Plakátállványok; Digitális A-táblák; Digitális kijelzőpanelek; Interaktív kijelzőpanelek; Interaktív gyerekasztalok; Kioszkok; Moduláris standok; Panorámák; Felugró standok; Asztali standok; Totemek; Átlátszó dobozstandok
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Werbung & Marketing > Messestand-Displays: Displays mit Hintergrundbeleuchtung; Bannerständer; Digitale Werbetafeln; Digital Signage-Flachbildschirme; Interaktive Flachbildschirme; Interaktive Kindertische; Kiosks; Modulare Displays; Panoramen; Pop-up-Displays; Tischaufsteller-Displays; Totems; Transparente Box-Displays
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Publicidade e marketing > Ecrãs de feira comercial: Expositores retroiluminados; Suportes para estandartes; Quadros digitais; Painéis planos de sinalização digitais; Painéis planos interativos; Mesas interativas para crianças; Quiosques; Expositores modulares; Panoramas; Expositores pop-up; Expositores de mesa; Totens; Expositores de caixa transparente
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Marketing et publicité > Présentoirs de salons professionnels: Présentoirs rétroéclairés; Supports de bannières; Tableaux numériques en A; Écrans plats de signalisation numérique; Écrans plats interactifs; Tables interactives pour enfants; Kiosques; Écrans modulaires; Panoramas; Présentoirs pop-up; Présentoirs de table; Totems; Présentoirs à boîtes transparentes
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Реклама и маркетинг > Дисплеи за търговски изложения: Дисплеи с подсветка; Стойки за банери; А-образни цифрови дисплеи; Плоски цифрови информационни табели; Интерактивни плоски табели; Интерактивни маси за деца; Павилиони; Модулни дисплеи; Панорами; Pop-Up дисплеи; Настолни дисплеи; Тотеми; Прозрачни кутии